Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.101

Business transactions of partner with partnership.

A partner may lend money to and transact other business with the limited partnership and, subject to other applicable law, has the same rights and obligations with respect to the loan or other transaction as a person that is not a partner.

[ 2022 c 42 s 202; 2009 c 188 s 112.]